Washington statutes.
RCW 15.35.010

Short title.

This chapter may be known and cited as the Washington state milk pooling act to provide for equitable pricing and pooling among producers and processors of milk and milk products.

[ 1993 c 345 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 230 s 1.]